Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1203
Political subdivisions; election expenses; duties; determination of charge.

(1) Each city, village, township, school district, public power district, community improvement district, metropolitan utilities district, fire protection district, natural resources district, regional metropolitan transit authority, community college area, learning community coordinating council, educational service unit, hospital district, reclamation district, library board, and airport authority shall pay for the costs of nominating and electing its officers as provided in subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this section. If a special issue is placed on the ballot at the time of the statewide primary or general election by any political subdivision, the political subdivision shall pay for the costs of the election as provided in subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this section.

(2) The charge for each primary and general election shall be determined by (a) ascertaining the total cost of all chargeable costs as described in section 32-1202, (b) dividing the total cost by the number of precincts participating in the election to fix the cost per precinct, (c) prorating the cost per precinct by the inked ballot inch in each precinct for each political subdivision, and (d) totaling the cost for each precinct for each political subdivision, except that the minimum charge for each primary and general election for each political subdivision shall be one hundred dollars.

(3) In lieu of the charge determined pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the election commissioner or county clerk may charge public power districts the fee for election costs set by section 70-610.

(4) In lieu of the charge determined pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the election commissioner or county clerk may bill school districts directly for the costs of an election held under section 10-703.01.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 368;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 104;

Laws 2008, LB1067, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB449, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB575, § 27;

Laws 2019, LB492, § 39;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 43;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 51;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 40;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 90.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB1075, section 40, with LB1114, section 90, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB1075 became operative July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1114 became operative April 17, 2026.